North Carolina, session 2025, SB106.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The sum of three million dollars ($3,000,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year is appropriated from the General Fund to the Onslow Water and
Sewer Authority for the construction of a water tower serving North Topsail Beach.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S106-v-1*